Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.646

Request for updated signature.

After certification of general, primary, and presidential primary election results, county auditors are encouraged to contact each registered voter to obtain an updated signature for the voter's registration file. Failure to respond to contact from the county auditor under this section shall not impact the voter's registration status. Any contact from a county auditor under this section must clearly state that the voter is not required to provide an updated signature and that providing an updated signature is not a requirement to vote in any future election.

[ 2024 c 269 s 2.]